src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb stems

## Preamble: Documenting the classes
contlex stem umlaut dict class

### Even stems

#### Verbklasse I
* BÅETEDH even row A/stem vowel -ie-, class I
* SEVTEDH  even row A class I impersonals
* ÅARAJEHTEDH even row A class I derived words -ehtedh, -estedh, -iste
* BUARADEHTEDH  even row A class I derived words -ehtedh, -estedh, -iste impersonals
* GÅETEDH even row A class I derived words -gåete
* STIEHPEGÅETEDH even row A class I derived words -gåete  impersonals
* ÅEREDH  even row A class I NO -øø-UMLAUT!Verbg 1

#### Verbklasse II
* TJEARODH even row C class II
* TSEAHKODH even row C class II
* ABRODH  even row C - class II impersonals

#### Verbklasse III
* GUARKEDH even row B class III

#### Verbklasse IV
* TJOEHPEDH even row D class IV
* BIEGKEDH  even row D - class IV impersonals
* GOEGKERDADTEDH even row D class IV derived words -alledh, -adte
* OBREDADTEDH  even row D class IV derived words -alledh, -adte  impersonals
* SOVVEDH even row D class IV derived words -sovvedh, htalledh = passives
* AHTJE  row D class IV derived words -ahtje
* OBRIJAHTJEDH   row D class IV derived words -ahtje   impersonals

#### Verbklasse V
* BÅÅHKEDH even row E class V
* VÅÅJNEDH even row E class V  passives

#### Verbklasse VI
* GÖÖLEDH even row F class VI
* BÖÖVTEDH even row F - class VI  impersonals

#### Verbklasse ulikestava
* GOLTELIDH odd !odd-syll with -adte- as Der2
* BALVEDIDH odd impersonals
* RIHPESIDH odd !odd-syll with -adte- as Der2 -nidh and -sidh
* DÅAJVOEHTIDH odd !for stems ending -t-: dåajvoeht-, odd-syll with -alle- as Der2
* LGIDH odd ending -lgi

## The actual continuation lexica

**LEXICON Verb** splits to AUX and Regular_verbs

**LEXICON AUX** lemma for *edtjedh, ij* and *lea*, each with their own contlex in **affixes**.

**LEXICON Regular_verbs** here comes the whole list, appr. 11000.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
